Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Cross references. —

For provisions that the legislature shall make provisions for attaching unorganized counties or territory to organized counties for judicial purposes, see art. 5, § 24, Wyo. Const.

For constitutional provisions as to county organization, see art. 12, §§ 1 to 5, Wyo. Const.

For duty of county to provide district court with seal, see §

5-3-110

.

As to county central committees of political parties, see chapter 4 of title 22.

As to selection of voting machines by county commissioners, see §

22-10-102

.

As to county, municipal and district health departments, see §

35-1-301

to

35-1-309

.

As to county board of equalization, see §

39-11-102

.1.

As to county department of public assistance and social services, see §

42-2-101

et seq.

Revision of title. —

Section 1, ch. 124, Laws 1977, revised this title. No detailed explanation of the changes made by the 1977 Act has been attempted, but where appropriate, the historical citations have been added to the revised sections.

Section 2, ch. 124, Laws 1977, reads: “If any other act of the legislature enacted during the same session in which this act is enacted is in conflict with the provisions of this act, the other act shall prevail in all cases to the extent of such conflict, regardless of whether enacted before or after the enactment of this act.”

Section 3, ch. 124, Laws 1977, reads: “Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 2 of this act, if House Bill 88 is enacted during the 1977 regular session, effective January 1, 1978, W.S. 18-95(a) is repealed and W.S. 18-95(b) is renumbered as W.S. 18-3-102(c) and subsequent subsections renumbered.”

Section 4, ch. 124, Laws 1977, reads: “If House Bill 88 is enacted during the 1977 regular session, effective January 1, 1978, W.S. 18-3-204(a)(vi), (vii) and (viii),

18-3-205

, 18-3-208and

18-10-214

are repealed.”

Section 5, ch. 124, Laws 1977, reads: “This act is effective January 1, 1978.”

Chapter 12, as enacted by § 1, ch. 124, Laws 1977, has been redesignated as present chapter 13, and the provisions which were enacted by § 1, ch. 173, Laws 1977, have been inserted as chapter 12. Other changes from § 1, ch. 124, Laws 1977, have been noted throughout the title where applicable.